sk-SK: Rozhranie sieťového kábla: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Iné
zh-TW: 網路線介面: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; 其他
de: Netzwerkkabelschnittstelle: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Sonstiges
fr: Interface de câble réseau: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Autre
da: Netværkskabelinterface: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Andet
el: Διεπαφή καλωδίου δικτύου: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Άλλο
ru: Интерфейс сетевого кабеля: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Другой
es: Interfaz de cable de red: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Otros
zh-CN: 网线接口: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; 其他
pl: Interfejs kabla sieciowego: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Inne
ko: 네트워크 케이블 인터페이스: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; 기타
en: Network cable interface: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Other
nb: Grensesnitt for nettverkskabel: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Annet
ja: ネットワークケーブルインターフェイス: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; その他
fi: Verkkokaapeliliitäntä: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Muu
nl: Netwerkkabelinterface: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Andere
vi: Giao diện cáp mạng: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Khác
hu: Hálózati kábel csatlakozója: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Egyéb
sl-SI: Omrežni kabelski vmesnik: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Drugo
pt-PT: Interface do cabo de rede: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Outro
sv: Nätverkskabelgränssnitt: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Övrigt
ro-RO: Interfață cablu de rețea: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Altele
tr: Ağ kablosu arayüzü: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Diğer
th: อินเตอร์เฟซสายเคเบิลเครือข่าย: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Интерфейс за мрежов кабел: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Други
it: Interfaccia cavo di rete: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Altro
pt-BR: Interface de cabo de rede: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Outro
cs: Rozhraní síťového kabelu: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Jiné
hr-HR: Sučelje mrežnog kabela: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Ostalo
lt-LT: Tinklo kabelio sąsaja: BNC; LC; MPO/MTP; MT-RJ; RJ-11; RJ-45; SC; ST; Kita